Rhode Island, session 2025, SB734.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 11 of the General Laws entitled "CRIMINAL OFFENSES" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 47.2
ASSAULT WEAPONS
11-47.2-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Assault weapon” means any weapon which automatically shoots, is designed to shoot,
or can be readily restored to shoot more than one shot without manual reloading by a single function
of the trigger. This shall include the frame or receiver of any such weapon, any part designed and
intended solely and exclusively, or combination of parts designed and intended for use in
converting a weapon into a machinegun, and any combination of parts from which a machine gun
can be assembled if the parts are in the possession or under the control of an individual.
(2) “Automatically shoots, is designed to shoot, or can be readily restored to shoot” means
functioning as the result of a self-acting or self-regulating mechanism that allows the firing of
multiple rounds though a single function of the trigger.
(3) “Federally licensed firearm dealer” means a person who holds a valid federal firearm
dealers license issued pursuant to 18 U.S.C. § 923(a).
(4) “Machine gun” means any weapon as defined in § 11-47-2(10) and shall include any
bump-stock device or similar device or attachment which allows a semi-automatic weapon to shoot

more than one shot with a single pull of the trigger by harnessing the recoil energy of the semi-
automatic weapon to which it is affixed so that the trigger resets and continues firing without
additional physical manipulation of the trigger by the shooter.
(5) The term “single function of the trigger” means a single pull of the trigger or an
analogous motion.
11-47.2-2. Assault weapons prohibited.
(a) No person, except for a federally licensed firearm dealer in compliance with federal
law, shall manufacture, sell, offer to sell, transfer, purchase, possess, or have under their control an
assault weapon, except as otherwise authorized under this chapter. Any person convicted of
violating the provisions of this section shall be punished by imprisonment of not more than ten (10)
years, or by a fine of up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), and the assault weapon
shall be subject to forfeiture.
(b) The provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to:
(1) Any law enforcement officer exempt under §§ 11-47-9 and 11-47-9.1;
(2) A qualified law enforcement officer under 18 U.S.C. 926 (b)(c) and who is carrying the
identification required by 18 U.S.C. 926(B)(d);
(3) An active duty member of the armed forces of the United States or the national guard
who is authorized to possess and carry an assault weapon;
(4) Any individual who on the effective date of this chapter was in lawful possession of an
assault weapon.
(c) For purposes of this section, a federally licensed firearm dealer who manufactures, sells,
offers to sell, transfers, purchases, possesses, or has under their control an assault weapon shall
follow all applicable provisions of 28 U.S.C §5849 and Alcohol Tobacco and Firearms rules and
regulations with respect to assault weapons.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on July 2, 2025.
========
LC002315
========
LC002315 - Page 2 of 3